New York, session 2025-2026, S9163.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 5 of section 63 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended to read as follows: 3 5. Not more than [one license] two licenses shall be granted to any 4 person under this section. 5 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 79 of the alcoholic beverage control law 6 is amended to read as follows: 7 2. Not more than [one license] two licenses shall be granted to any 8 person under this section. 9 § 3. Section 105 of the alcoholic beverage control law is amended by 10 adding a new subdivision 2-a to read as follows: 11 2-a. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contra- 12 ry: 13 (i) A licensee issued under section sixty-three of this chapter shall 14 be authorized to purchase wine or liquor from, and to sell wine or 15 liquor to, any other licensee issued under section sixty-three of this 16 chapter, and may resell any wine or liquor so purchased for consumption 17 off the premises. 18 (ii) A licensee issued under section sixty-three of this chapter shall 19 be authorized to purchase wine from, and to sell wine to, a licensee 20 issued under section seventy-nine of this chapter, and may resell any 21 wine so purchased for consumption off the premises. 22 (iii) A licensee issued under section seventy-nine of this chapter 23 shall be authorized to purchase wine from, and sell wine to, any other 24 licensee issued under section seventy-nine or section sixty-three of 25 this chapter, and may resell any wine so purchased for consumption off 26 the premises. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14814-01-6 S. 9163 2 1 (b) Both the selling and purchasing licensees shall retain a receipt 2 or invoice for each transaction authorized by this subdivision in 3 accordance with the state liquor authority's existing books and records 4 requirements and such records shall be made available for inspection by 5 the state liquor authority and its duly authorized agents upon request. 6 The receipt or invoice shall show, at a minimum: 7 (i) the name, address, and license number of the seller; 8 (ii) the name, address, and license number of the purchaser; 9 (iii) the date of the transaction; 10 (iv) a description of the alcoholic beverages transferred (brand and 11 quantity); and 12 (v) the price. 13 (c) The state liquor authority may promulgate rules and regu- 14 lations necessary to implement the provisions of this subdivision. 15 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 17 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 18 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 19 completed on or before such effective date.